District of Columbia statutes.
4-405

Schedule of payments by parents.

(a)

Parents who receive day care services pursuant to § 4-404 [repealed] shall pay a portion of services according to the sliding scale set forth in subsection (b) of this section.

(b)

Increment Adjusted Income Parent Fee (Percent of Child Care Paid by Parent)

Increment
Adjusted Income
Parent Fee (Percent of Child Care Paid by Parent)

1
Under $8,020
Flat Fee of $2 per week

2
$8,020–$9,012
5%

3
$9,013–$10,005
10%

4
$10,006–$10,998
15%

5
$10,999–$11,991
20%

6
$11,992–$12,984
25%

7
$12,985–$13,977
30%

8
$13,978–$14,970
35%

9
$14,971–$15,963
40%

10
$15,964–$16,956
45%

11
$16,957–$17,949
50%

12
$17,950–$18,942
55%

13
$18,943–$19,935
60%

14
$19,936–$20,928
65%

15
$20,929–$21,921
70%

16 Over
$21,921
100%

(c)

The fee schedule shall be effective April 1, 1990. The Mayor may revise the fee schedule by rule.

History

Sept. 19, 1979, D.C. Law 3-16, § 6, 26 DCR 20
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-166, § 2, 27 DCR 5355
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-163, § 2(c), 29 DCR 3974
June 22, 1990, D.C. Law 8-144, § 3(c), 37 DCR 2974
Mar. 6, 1991, D.C. Law 8-202, § 3(c), 37 DCR 7937
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 11, 40 DCR 6311

Section References

This section is referenced in § 4-402.01 and § 4-409.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-305.
1973 Ed., § 3-305.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 8-202, the “D.C. Family Support Act Federal Conformity Amendment Act of 1990”, Effective March 6, 1991, see Mayor’s Order 2000-157, October 12, 2000 ( 47 DCR 8683).